District of Columbia statutes.
7-1304.05

Hearing conducted promptly.

(a)

The hearing in commitment proceedings shall be conducted promptly after filing of the petition pursuant to § 7-1303.04(a).

(b)

A status hearing shall be held promptly after filing of the petition pursuant to § 7-1303.04(b-1).

History

Mar. 3, 1979, D.C. Law 2-137, § 405, 25 DCR 5094
Oct. 17, 2002, D.C. Law 14-199, § 2(m), 49 DCR 7647

Section References

This section is referenced in § 7-1304.06a.

Prior Codifications

1981 Ed., § 6-1945.
1973 Ed., § 6-1672.

Effect of Amendments

D.C. Law 14-199 designated subsec. (a), and in that subsection, substituted “petition pursuant to § 7-1303.04(a)” for “petition”; and added subsec. (b).

Emergency Legislation

For temporary (90 day) amendment of section, see § 2(j) of Civil Commitment of Citizens with Mental Retardation Emergency Amendment Act of 2002 (D.C. Act 14-383, June 12, 2002, 49 DCR 5701).
For temporary (90 day) amendment of section, see § 2(j) of Civil Commitment of Citizens with Mental Retardation Legislative Review Emergency Amendment Act of 2002 (D.C. Act 14-454, July 23, 2002, 49 DCR 8096).